Hawaii statutes.
§576D-8 Transmittal of money collected to
department of human services. The moneys collected by the agency on behalf
of the department of human services shall be transmitted to the department of
human services as required by Title IV-D of the Social Security Act. [L 1986, c
332, pt of §2; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 2002, c 72, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next